src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred.  No comparatives. 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ållagattjav, Attr: ållagasj.
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :%>     ATTR          ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>     ENDLEX        ;
!        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV           ; !
                        :a%>    SURGULASJ-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! +A:a%>Q1 BU/MUS ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t ENDLEX        ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>     R             ; !is only last cmp
!               +A+Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ; !is only last cmp
!               +A+Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ; !is only last cmp

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: belulasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ belulasj:             belulasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ belulattjav:           belulasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ belulasj:             belulasj+A+Attr

LEXICON DÁRBULASJ 
+A+CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: dárbulattjav, Attr: dárbulasj. Essive -attjan, -adtjan is subtaged.
! +A:asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      ENDLEX            ;
                        :asj%>      ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; !This seems right. TO
! +A:attja%> BU/MUS ; !unusual comp. and superl.
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   ENDLEX            ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgGen:attja%>    R                 ;
!               +A+Cmp/PlGen:attja%>j   R                 ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
                 +Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
        +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:adtja%>    PxV               ; !

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: dábálasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ dábálasj:             dábálasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ dábálattjav:          dábálasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ dábálasj:             dábálasj+A+Attr
!!€ dábális:             dábálasj+A+Attr
!!€ dábálabbo:            dábálasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom


LEXICON ASIDASJ
+A+CmpNP/Last: ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;

LEXICON ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, -is attr. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: asidattjav, Attr: asidis.
                        :asj        VUOHTA            ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :is%>       ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      ENDLEX            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; !This seems right. TO
! +A:attja%> BU/MUS ; !unusual comp. and superl.
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   ENDLEX            ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgGen:attja%>    R                 ;
!               +A+Cmp/PlGen:attja%>j   R                 ;
                +Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
                +Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
       +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
       +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:adtja%>    PxV               ; !

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gågulasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ gågulasj:             gågulasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gågulattjav:          gågulasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gågulis:             gågulasj+A+Attr
!!€ gågulabbo:            gågulasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON UDNODIBME !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -dibme, attribute on -is. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: udnodimev, Attr: udnodis.
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:is%>      ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 +A:ibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                 +A:ibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 +A:ibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
                 +A:%>        ABBO/AMOS         ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ibme%>Q1t ENDLEX            ;
        +A+Cmp/SgGen:ibme%>Q1  R                 ;
        +A+Cmp/PlGen:ibme%>Q1j R                 ;
!                 +A:          DUVVAT            ; ! this cant be correct?

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gælvodibme # Even-syllable test
!!€ gælvodibme:             gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gälvodibme:             gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gælvodimev:          gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gälvodimev:          gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gælvodis:              gælvodibme+A+Attr
!!€ gälvodis:              gælvodibme+A+Attr
!!€ gælvodabbo:            gælvodibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ gälvodabbo:            gælvodibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON TJALMEDIBME !!= @CODE@  Like UDNODIBME but no comparatives. Sg Acc: tjalmedimev, Attr: tjalmedis.
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:is%>      ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 +A:ibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                 +A:ibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 +A:ibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ibme%>Q1t ENDLEX            ;
        +A+Cmp/SgGen:ibme%>Q1  R                 ;
        +A+Cmp/PlGen:ibme%>Q1j R                 ;
 !                +A:          DUVVAT            ; ! this cant be correct?

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: huvsodibme # Even-syllable test
!!€ huvsodibme:            huvsodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ huvsodimev:            huvsodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ huvsodis:              huvsodibme+A+Attr

LEXICON SUOLASIEHKE !!= @CODE@ -siehke. Sg Acc: suolasiegev, attr: suolasiek
                 +A:hke%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
          +A+Sg+Nom:hke%>    ENDLEX            ;
                 +A:k%>      ATTR              ;
                 +A:hke%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 +A:hke%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
! +A:hke%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:hke%>Q1t K                 ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: hánessiehke # Even-syllable test
!!€ hánessiehke:              hánessiehke+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hánessiegev:              hánessiehke+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hánessiek:                hánessiehke+A+Attr

!! !!Odd-syllable stems
! ------------------

LEXICON TJIEGOS !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -s, negating adjs on -dahkes, with attr same as pred. For adjectives with -e in second syllable e>á: divtes>diktásav in StrG. As a. in Spiik.  Sg Acc: tjiehkusav, Attr: tjiegos. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>X2   ATTR           ;
! +A:%>X2 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:%>X2   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it ENDLEX         ;
                 +A:%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: hánes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ hánes:               hánes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hádnásav:            hánes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hánes:               hánes+A+Attr
!!€ hádnásabbo:          hánes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
