src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ajiksiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajeksie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
ajiksiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajiksie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
anulasj:anul DÁRBULASJ ;
asidasj:asid ASIDASJ ;
asit:asid9 TJIEGOS ;
asstelasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:asstel ASIDASJ ; !
asstelasj+Err/Orth:astel ASIDASJ ; !from adverb file
bargodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bargod TJALMEDIBME ; !
biekkos:bieggos TJIEGOS ;
bieljedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bieljed TJALMEDIBME ; !
bijteksiehke:bijteksie SUOLASIEHKE ;
bilkálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bilkál ASIDASJ ; !
boanndisiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:boanndisie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
buoljas:buolljas TJIEGOS ;
báhkotjalmedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:báhkotjalmed TJALMEDIBME ; !
bájnodibme:bájnod TJALMEDIBME ;
delas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dellas TJIEGOS ; !
dettalasj:dettal DÁRBULASJ ;
doajvodibme:doajvod TJALMEDIBME ;
duodalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duodal DÁRBULASJ ; !
dábálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+v2:dábál ASIDASJ ; !
dájdalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dájdal ASIDASJ ; !
dájdulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dájdul DÁRBULASJ ; !
dámes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dábmes TJIEGOS ; !
dármedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dármed TJALMEDIBME ; !
dásálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dásál DÁRBULASJ ; !
dårvulasj:dårvul DÁRBULASJ ;
dåssjedibme:dåssjed UDNODIBME ;
ejnagasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ejnag ASIDASJ ; !
fámodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fámod TJALMEDIBME ; !
gallas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:galºlas TJIEGOS ; !
gieladibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gielad TJALMEDIBME ; !
gierddavasj:gierddav DÁRBULASJ ;
gijtodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gijtod TJALMEDIBME ; !
gijtulasj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gijttul DÁRBULASJ ; !
goasos:goassos TJIEGOS ;
guoros:guorros TJIEGOS ;
guottodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guottod TJALMEDIBME ; !
guovdálasj:guovdál DÁRBULASJ ;
gárves:gárvves TJIEGOS ;
gågulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gågul ASIDASJ ; !
gælvodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gælvod UDNODIBME ; !
gænodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gænod TJALMEDIBME ; !
hebas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hehpas TJIEGOS ; !
hebulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hebul DÁRBULASJ ; !
huohppelasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:huohppel ASIDASJ ; !
huolodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:huolod UDNODIBME ; !
huvsulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:huvsul DÁRBULASJ ; !
hámedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hámed TJALMEDIBME ; !
hánessiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hánessie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
hæbodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hæbod UDNODIBME ; !
iehpejergalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehpejergal DÁRBULASJ ; !
iehpevisses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehpevisºses TJIEGOS ; !
jiermedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiermed TJALMEDIBME ; !
jiermálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiermál DÁRBULASJ ; !
joavddelasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:joavddel ASIDASJ ; !
juonalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juonal ASIDASJ ; !
jáhkkulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkkul ASIDASJ ; !
jáhkulasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkul ASIDASJ ; !
loabedibme:loabed TJALMEDIBME ;
luovas:luovvas TJIEGOS ;
lájtodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lájtod UDNODIBME ; !
låptos:låpptos TJIEGOS ;
merkalasj:merkal DÁRBULASJ ;
moaressiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moaressie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
mujtodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mujtod TJALMEDIBME ; !
mánnálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánnál DÁRBULASJ ; !
mánnásiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánnásie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
mánádibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánád TJALMEDIBME ; !
målsudahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:målsudahkkes TJIEGOS ; !
njalkas:njalkkas TJIEGOS ;
næros:nærros TJIEGOS ;
oanegasj:oaneg ASIDASJ ;
oattjálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oattjál DÁRBULASJ ; !
rundos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:runndos TJIEGOS ; !
ráfálasj+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ráfel DÁRBULASJ ; !
råsjkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:råssjkas TJIEGOS ; !
sahkodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sahkod TJALMEDIBME ; !
siehke:sie SUOLASIEHKE ;
sjiehtes:sjiehttes TJIEGOS ;
sjávodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjávod UDNODIBME ; !
skámodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skámod TJALMEDIBME ; !
stuores+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorres TJIEGOS ; !
sturdudibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sturdud UDNODIBME ; !
suolasiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suolasie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
sárnnediddjesiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sárnnediddjesie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
sávredibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sávred TJALMEDIBME ; !
tjalmálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjalmál DÁRBULASJ ; !
tjalsas:tjalssas TJIEGOS ; 
tjiegossiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjiegossie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
tjáhtjesiehke:tjáhtjesie SUOLASIEHKE ;
tjådålasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjådål ASIDASJ ; !
udnodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:udnod UDNODIBME ; !
vejulasj:vejul DÁRBULASJ ;
viekses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viekºses TJIEGOS ; ! too do SÁDDNES også?
vuojtodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuojtod TJALMEDIBME ; !
vuollegasj:vuolleg ASIDASJ ;
vuorassiehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuorassie SUOLASIEHKE ; !
vuorbálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuorbál DÁRBULASJ ; !
vágedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:váged UDNODIBME ; !
vájván+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájván TJIEGOS ; !
várálasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várál DÁRBULASJ ; !
ájnegasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ájneg ASIDASJ ; !
ármodibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ármod TJALMEDIBME ; !
ålleslasj+Err/Der:ållesl DÁRBULASJ ;
årodibme:årod TJALMEDIBME ;
